California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the fee for filing the notice of appeal shall be as provided in Section 70615 of the Government Code. The court shall request that the processing agency’s file on the case be forwarded to the court, to be received within 15 calendar days of the request. The court shall notify the appellant of the appearance date by mail or personal delivery. The court shall retain the fee regardless of the outcome of the appeal. If the court finds in favor of the appellant, the amount of the filing fee shall be reimbursed to the appellant by the processing
 agency. Any deposit of fare evasion or passenger conduct penalty shall be refunded by the processing agency in accordance with the judgment of the court.

(c) The conduct of the appeal under this section is a subordinate judicial duty that may be performed by a commissioner and other subordinate judicial officers at the direction of the presiding judge of the court.

(d) If a notice of appeal of the processing agency’s decision described in subdivision (c) of Section 99581 is not filed within the period set forth in subdivision (a), that decision shall be deemed final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 738, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11.5. CLEAN AIR AND TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT ACT OF 1990 [99600. - 99696.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [99600. - 99605.]

99600.

This part shall be known as the Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Act of 1990.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99601.

The people of California find and declare all of the following:

(a) Rail transportation results in cleaner air, less energy use, more transportation opportunities for those who cannot drive, and less crowding on already overcrowded streets and highways.

(b) For these reasons, it is appropriate to use state general obligation bonds to finance rail infrastructure.

(c) This part will result in implementation of part of an overall transportation plan which will provide cleaner air and better transportation options for all Californians.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99602.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings, unless expressly stated otherwise:

(a) “CalTrain” means the commuter rail service operated along the San Francisco Peninsula commute corridor.

(b) “Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(c) “Commuter rail service” and its derivative terms have the same meaning as the
 term “commuter service” and its derivative terms, as defined in paragraph (9) of subsection (a) of Section 502 of Title 45 of the United States Code.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(e) “Exclusive public mass transit guideway” means a transit capital improvement included in the definition of this term as applied and used in 70 Op. Atty. Gen. 119 or a transit capital improvement for which motor vehicle fuel tax funds from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund were actually allocated by the commission on or before January 1, 1989.

(f) “Fund” means the Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Fund created by Section 99610.

(g) “Grade separations” means grade separations for either passenger or freight rail
 services.

(h) “Intercity rail” and its derivative terms means passenger rail service between urban areas of the state.

(i) “Local agency” means a county, city, city and county, county transportation commission, county transportation authority, transit development board, transit district, or any joint powers agency specified in this part.

(j) “Rail project” means a commuter passenger rail service project, an intercity passenger rail project, or a rail transit project, and includes exclusive public mass transit guideway projects and the project described in Section 99624. 

(k) “Rail transit” means a rail mass transportation operation usually within an urban area, generally characterized by more frequent service over shorter distances than normally
 provided by commuter rail service or intercity rail service, and operating on a rail line without any or with very limited rail freight service.

(l) “Right-of-way” means right-of-way for rail purposes, including separate right-of-way alignments adjacent to existing freight lines.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99603.

(a) The department shall establish an advisory committee to assist the department in developing specifications for standard state-of-the-art California commuter and intercity rail cars and locomotives. The committee shall consist of representatives from all affected local transportation agencies as well as the department’s Division of Mass Transportation and one consumer representative.

(b) The purpose of the standard equipment is to facilitate joint procurement in
 economic quantities, to further interchangeability of equipment among corridors, and to reduce maintenance costs by minimizing the need for spare parts inventories.

(c) To the extent possible, the committee shall rely on the department’s existing work in procuring new equipment for CalTrain.

(d) The committee shall investigate the feasibility of a uniform design of a rail car shell which could be deployed in both intercity and commuter rail applications, with car interiors to be appropriately outfitted for either intercity or commuter service.

(e) The committee shall consider two types of coach service, dining or cafe car service, or both, and economical sleeping car service for intercity applications.

(f) The committee shall consider inclusion of
 sanitary holding tanks and reasonable passenger amenities including, but not limited to, accommodations for a reasonable number of bicycles carried on board by passengers, for both intercity and commuter applications.

(g) Intercity equipment specifications shall not be adopted unless approved by the National Railroad Passenger Corporation.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99604.

If bonds sufficient to fund the total aggregate of the amounts specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) cannot be sold pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99690), the allocation for each project shall be reduced proportionately.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99605.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the Legislature may amend this part, by statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the journal, four-fifths of the membership concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this part. No changes shall be made in the way in which funds are allocated pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620), except pursuant to Section 99684.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Fund [99610. - 99614.]

99610.

The Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Fund is hereby created.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99611.

It is the intent of the people of California, in enacting this part, that bond funds shall not be used to displace existing sources of funds for rail and other forms of public transportation, including, but not limited to, funds that have been provided pursuant to Article XIX of the California Constitution, the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund, the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11), and local transportation sales taxes; that any future comprehensive
 transportation funding legislation shall not offset or reduce the amounts otherwise made available for transit purposes by this act; and that funding for public transit should be increased from existing sources including fuel taxes and sales tax on fuels.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99612.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money deposited in the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the commission, without regard to fiscal years, for allocation for grants to itself, the department, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and to local agencies pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620).

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99613.

(a) The commission shall allocate money from the fund in accordance with the allocations specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) to the department, to the Department of Parks and Recreation, and to local agencies as grants for expenditure for the preservation, acquisition, construction, or improvement of any of the following:

(1) Rights-of-way for rail purposes.

(2) Rail terminals and
 stations.

(3) Rolling stock, including locomotives, passenger cars, and related rail equipment and facilities.

(4) Grade separations and other improvements along rail rights-of-way for rail purposes.

(5) Rail maintenance facilities.

(6) Other capital facilities deemed necessary for a specified rail service, including soundwalls.

(7) Capital expenditures for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(8) Paratransit vehicles, bicycle facilities, and water-borne ferry vessels and facilities.

(9) The
 project described in Section 99648.

(b) The commission shall require each applicant for a grant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620), including the department, to demonstrate in its application that if the grant funds being applied for are awarded, no other funds which were previously planned, programmed, or approved for rail purposes will be used for other than rail purposes.

(c) Consistent with Section 99665, money from the fund may be used to satisfy any federal, state or local matching fund requirement for the project to be funded. Money from the fund may be used to provide local matching funds for grade separations pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1202 or Section 1202.5.

(d) Authorized expenditures listed in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are “rail projects” as
 defined in subdivision (j) of Section 99602.

(e) Grant funds shall be expended only for capital expenditures.

(f) Projects to be funded shall include, to the greatest extent possible, projects which integrate and facilitate transfers between rail lines, including all rail lines for which funding is provided by this part.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99614.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 16312 of the Government Code and Section 99694.5 of this part, the interest on any loans made from the Pooled Money Investment Account to the fund for the purposes of carrying out the purposes of this part shall be paid from the General Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13440 of the Government Code, the amounts required to be paid pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund.

(c) The appropriations for interest payments pursuant to subdivision (b) are appropriations for debt service, as defined in Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and are therefore exempt from the appropriations limit set by that article.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Grants [99620. - 99655.]

99620.

This chapter sets forth the purposes and the amounts for which allocations shall be made from the fund. Money from the fund shall be awarded as grants by the commission pursuant to Sections 99622 to 99651, inclusive, for the purposes specified in those sections. The amount of a grant awarded pursuant to any of those sections shall not exceed the amount specified therein. The department and local agencies may implement service funded pursuant to this chapter on an incremental basis.
 Partial grants may be made for preliminary engineering and design purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99622.

Two hundred thirty million dollars ($230,000,000) shall be allocated to the department for all of the following:

(a) Improvements to the Los Angeles-Fresno-San Francisco Bay Area passenger rail corridor and extension of the corridor to Sacramento, one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000), including at least sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) for rail rehabilitation and other rail improvements to provide intercity rail service between Fresno and Oakland via Madera, Merced, Turlock,
 and Modesto, and not more than thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for rehabilitation and other rail improvements to provide intercity rail service between Stockton and Sacramento via Lodi and Galt.

(b) Preliminary engineering and feasibility studies of a high speed passenger rail link between Bakersfield and Los Angeles, five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) Implementation of intercity rail service from Placer County to Santa Clara County, eightyfive million dollars ($85,000,000), of which not more than thirtyfive million dollars ($35,000,000) shall be for commuter rail service between Auburn and Davis, including funding for right-of-way acquisition. Service to Woodland may also be provided, if deemed practicable by the department.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99623.

(a) Eightyone million dollars ($81,000,000) shall be allocated to the department for intercity and commuter rail projects along the Los Angeles-Santa Barbara rail corridor to be allocated for expenditure as follows:

(1) In Ventura County, thirtyone million dollars ($31,000,000).

(2) In Santa Barbara County, seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000).

(3) In Los Angeles County, thirtythree million dollars ($33,000,000).

(b) The funds allocated for expenditure in Los Angeles and Ventura Counties may be expended in coordination with a joint powers agency required to be established for commuter rail service pursuant to Section 130255 within that segment of the corridor.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99624.

(a) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) to the department for grade separations along the Alameda-San Pedro branch rail line connecting the Los Angeles and Long Beach Harbors with downtown Los Angeles and paralleling Alameda Street, to alleviate vehicle traffic congestion, conserve energy, reduce air pollution in the area, and facilitate the more efficient and expeditious shipment of freight to and from the Los Angeles and Long Beach Harbors. The current owner of the Alameda-San Pedro branch line may, at its option, continue to own
 and operate the line and related right-of-way.

(b) The allocation and granting of funds pursuant to this Section shall be exempt from Sections 99653 and 99663. The allocation and granting of funds pursuant to this section shall also be exempt from subdivision (c) of Section 1202, and Sections 1202.5 and 99317.8 of the Public Utilities Code, and Sections 2450 to 2461, inclusive, of the Streets and Highways Code if the affected railroad corporation contributes ten (10) percent of the costs of constructing the grade separations funded pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any provision of this code or the Streets and Highways Code, no city on the Alameda-San Pedro branch line shall be assessed costs for the grade separations. The department is the sole state agency responsible for designing, determining priorities, and implementing the construction of those grade separations. The department shall coordinate its planning with any joint powers
 agency established to represent affected cities, local agencies, or commissions. The department shall further coordinate and cooperate with any such joint powers agency so that the expenditure of any federal, local, and private funds including those for tracks, switching, and interconnection improvements, and the possible construction of a proposed Alameda Street truck corridor is accomplished in an efficient and well-planned manner.

(c) For the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), grade separations funded pursuant to this section and all related track and switching improvements and rail interconnections shall be considered to be one project.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99625.

(a) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) shall be allocated to the department for the improvement of rail service, including rail freight service and tourist-related services, important to the regional economy of Humboldt County.

(b) The commission shall not approve a grant for purposes of this section unless the Board of Supervisors of the County of Humboldt makes a finding that the project proposed for funding is in the public interest and vital to the economy of the
 county and the commission determines that the proposed project will serve a public purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the grant authorized by this section may be used by the Humboldt County Association of Governments, at its request, for any of the purposes specified in Section 99628.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99626.

(a) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be allocated to the department for the improvement of rail service, including rail freight service and tourist-related services, important to the regional economy of Mendocino County.

(b) The commission shall not approve a grant for purposes of this section unless the Board of Supervisors of the County of Mendocino makes a finding that the project proposed for funding is in the public interest and vital to the economy of the
 county and the commission determines that the proposed project will serve a public purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the grant authorized by this section may be used by the Mendocino Council of Governments, at its request, for any of the purposes specified in Section 99628.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99627.

(a) If the Legislature establishes a railroad transportation authority which includes, or which is subsequently expanded to include, within its jurisdiction, Humboldt County or Mendocino County, or both of them, the authority shall be substituted for the department and affected councils of government as the applicant and the grantee agency for purposes of Sections 99625 and 99626.

(b) If the authority includes, or is expanded to include, within its jurisdiction, Del
 Norte County, the authority shall be substituted for the county as the applicant and grantee agency for purposes of Section 99628.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99628.

(a) Seventythree million dollars ($73,000,000) for allocation by the commission on a per capita basis to the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Imperial, Inyo, Lake, Lassen, Mariposa, Modoc, Mono, Napa, Nevada, Plumas, San Benito, San Luis Obispo, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, and Yuba, for railroad grade crossing improvements, acquisition of railroad rights-of-way for rail transportation purposes, rail passenger or other rail
 stations, railroad soundwalls, and other local rail improvements for safety; purchase of paratransit vehicles; and other capital facilities for public transportation. Funds may not be allocated for street or highway improvements, operations, maintenance, or construction.

(b) Application for grants shall be submitted to the commission by the transportation planning agency having jurisdiction in the county.

(c) If the commission has not received applications by December 31, 1992, for all of the funds available for allocation pursuant to this section, it may reallocate the remaining funds on the basis of a competitive grants program to the counties specified in subdivision (a). The commission shall adopt regulations or guidelines governing the competitive program allocations to proposals which best serve the purposes of this part.

(d) Funds allocated pursuant to this section and Section 99639 may be pooled by any combination of the recipient counties and used with private funds to acquire existing railroad rights-of-ways for passenger and freight rail projects, or for other rail projects.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99629.

Two hundred two million dollars ($202,000,000) shall be allocated to the Los Angeles-San Diego Rail Corridor Agency for intercity and commuter rail projects for expenditure as follows:

(a) In San Diego County, fortyfive million dollars ($45,000,000).

(b) In Orange County, eightytwo million dollars ($82,000,000).

(c) In Los Angeles County, seventyfive million dollars ($75,000,000).

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99630.

Two hundred twentynine million dollars ($229,000,000) shall be allocated to the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission, for expenditure on rail projects within Los Angeles County as follows:

(a) Not less than eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) thereof shall be allocated for Metro Rail.

(b) Not less than eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) thereof shall be allocated for rail projects other than
 Metro Rail within Los Angeles County.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99631.

(a) Seventynine million dollars ($79,000,000) shall be allocated to the joint powers agency required to be established pursuant to Section 130255, for the San Bernardino-Riverside-Orange County rail corridor, for expenditure for commuter rail projects as follows:

(1) In Riverside County, fortyseven million dollars ($47,000,000).

(2) In Orange County,
 twentyseven million dollars ($27,000,000).

(3) In San Bernardino County, five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) If full or partial funding for the project in Riverside County becomes available from other sources, application may be made by the Riverside County Transportation Commission to use the portion of the grant not needed for the project for other rail projects in the county.

(c) If full or partial funding for the project in San Bernardino County becomes available from other sources, application may be made by the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission to use the portion of the grant not needed for the project for other rail projects in the county.

(d) If full or partial funding for the project in Orange County
 becomes available from other sources, application may be made by the Orange County Transportation Commission to use the portion of the grant not needed for the project for other rail projects in the county.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99632.

(a) Ninetyeight million dollars ($98,000,000) shall be allocated to the joint powers agency required to be established pursuant to Section 130255, for the San Bernardino-Los Angeles rail corridor, for expenditure for commuter rail projects as follows:

(1) In Los Angeles County, fortytwo million dollars ($42,000,000).

(2) In San Bernardino County,
 fiftysix million dollars ($56,000,000).

(b) If full or partial funding for the project in Los Angeles County becomes available from other sources, the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission may make application to use the portion of the grant not needed for the project for other rail projects in the county.

(c) If full or partial funding for the project in San Bernardino County becomes available from other sources, application may be made by the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission to use the portion of the grant not needed for the project for other rail projects in the county.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99633.

Sixty-one million dollars ($61,000,000) shall be allocated to the Alameda County Transportation Commission for expenditure on rail projects of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District and other rail projects within Alameda County, as determined by the authority. Projects funded pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the new rail starts and extensions plan of the Metropolitan Transportation
 Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 9.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99634.

Thirtyseven million dollars ($37,000,000) shall be allocated to the Contra Costa Transportation Authority for expenditure on rail projects of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District and other rail projects within Contra Costa County, as determined by the authority. Projects funded pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the new rail starts and extensions plan of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99635.

Thirtyfive million dollars ($35,000,000) shall be allocated to the Public Utilities Commission of the City and County of San Francisco, for expenditure for rail projects within the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99636.

One hundred seventythree million dollars ($173,000,000) shall be allocated to the Peninsula Corridor Study Joint Powers Board for CalTrain capital improvements and acquisition of rights-of-way, as follows:

(a) In the City and County of San Francisco, thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000).

(b) In San Mateo County, nineteen million dollars ($19,000,000).

(c) In Santa Clara County, twentyone million dollars ($21,000,000), to be allocated for expenditure as follows:

(1) Existing service from San Jose, seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000). 

(2) Extension of service south of San Jose to the county line, four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(d) Acquisition of rights-of-way, one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99637.

Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated to the San Mateo County Transit District for expenditure for extensions of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District within San Mateo County.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99638.

Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) shall be allocated to the Monterey County Transportation Commission for the following:

(a) Extension of CalTrain service.

(b) Other rail projects within Monterey County.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99639.

(a) Twentyeight million dollars ($28,000,000) shall be allocated to a joint powers agency responsible for expenditure for a rail project along the Santa Rosa to Larkspur rail corridor.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) of the grant authorized by this section may be allocated to the Board of Supervisors of the County of Marin, and seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) may be allocated to the Board of
 Supervisors of the County of Sonoma, for expenditure on the rail project described in subdivision (a) or for any of the purposes specified in Section 99628, if both boards concur.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99640.

Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) shall be allocated to the Santa Cruz County Transportation Commission for the following:

(a) Intercity passenger rail projects connecting the City of Santa Cruz with the Watsonville Junction.

(b) Other rail projects within Santa Cruz County which facilitate recreational, commuter, intercity and intercounty travel.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99641.

Fortyseven million dollars ($47,000,000) shall be allocated to the Santa Clara County Transit District, for expenditure for rail projects within Santa Clara County.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99642.

Seventyseven million dollars ($77,000,000) shall be allocated on a per capita basis to the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board and the North San Diego County Transit Development Board for expenditure for rail projects within San Diego County.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99643.

One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be allocated to the Sacramento Regional Transit District for rail transit projects.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99644.

Fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) shall be allocated to the San Joaquin Council of Governments for expenditure for rail projects along the Stockton-Manteca-Tracy corridor to the Alameda County line, including three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for a preliminary engineering and economic study of passenger rail service along the Stockton-Livermore (Altamont) corridor. Projects funded pursuant to this section shall be consistent with a locally adopted regional transportation plan.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99645.

One hundred twentyfive million dollars ($125,000,000) shall be allocated to the City of Irvine for construction of a guideway demonstration project.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99646.

Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated to the City of Vallejo for expenditure on water-borne ferry vessels and terminal improvements.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99647.

Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) shall be allocated to the City of South Lake Tahoe for expenditure on acquisition of rights-ofway, construction of an intermodal station, and related facilities for an exclusive public mass transit guideway project.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99648.

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Department of Parks and Recreation for construction of the California State Museum of Railroad Technology. These funds shall be provided to the Department of Parks and Recreation when sufficient funding for the entire project is available.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99649.

(a) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be allocated by the commission to fund a competitive program for the acquisition of both commuter and intercity rail cars and locomotives designed pursuant to Section 99603. Local agencies and the department may apply for these funds, which shall be allocated to the department for a joint purchase. No matching funds shall be required for this competitive program. A local agency may contract with the department for purchase of additional rail equipment funded with other funds
 available to the local agency, including funds made available by this chapter. No funds made available by the commission pursuant to this chapter shall be used to purchase intercity or commuter rail cars or locomotives other than the standard equipment designed pursuant to Section 99603.

(b) The department shall estimate the need for commuter and intercity rail cars and locomotives to be ordered pursuant to this section and establish a delivery schedule based on the needs of the operators of rail service. Orders for rail cars and locomotives shall include options as deemed necessary by the department to ensure that equipment is delivered when needed and to permit additional future orders.

(c) The department may purchase rail cars and locomotives by competitive bid or competitive negotiation, and may negotiate sale-lease back provisions if determined to be advantageous. Proceeds
 from sale-lease back shall be used to acquire additional rail cars and equipment.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99650.

(a) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be allocated to fund a program of competitive grants to local agencies for capital outlay for bicycle improvement projects which improve safety and convenience for bicycle commuters. 

(b) Grants for the establishment of separate bicycle paths and ways shall be awarded only if the department determines that the route established will be principally used by bicycle commuters.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99651.

Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be allocated to fund a program of competitive grants to local agencies for the construction, improvement, acquisition, and other capital expenditures associated with water-borne ferry operations for the transportation of passengers or vehicles, or both.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99652.

Not more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) may be allocated for the administration of this part by the commission to pay its expenses and the expenses of the department in administering this part. The commission may contract with the department for technical review services needed to review grant applications pursuant to this section. The commission shall not reduce the amount of a grant authorized by this chapter to defray the costs of analyzing grant applications or any other costs associated with its administration of this
 part.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99653.

In any case in which funds are granted or allocated for expenditure within specified counties or regions in or along a rail corridor, the grantee agency, including the department may, by resolution, and with the approval of the commission and of all the agencies which program capital improvements for transportation purposes along the affected part of the corridor, reallocate the funds for expenditure elsewhere along the corridor. For the purposes of this section, a corridor is a route used to provide passenger rail service.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99654.

Any agency or combination of agencies which is the successor to an agency having any rights, powers, duties, or obligations under this part, including eligibility to apply for, award, receive, and expend a grant, shall fully succeed to those rights, powers, duties, and obligations.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99655.

As of June 30, 2007, fourteen million five hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($14,563,000) allocated for the improvement of the Los Angeles-Fresno-San Francisco Bay Area passenger rail corridor in Section 99622 remains unexpended, and one million dollars ($1,000,000) allocated for rail
 right-of-way studies in former Section 99621 remains unexpended. Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99684, the unexpended funds cited in this section are hereby reallocated to the department and shall be made available for expenditure by the High-Speed Rail Authority for the state-sponsored high-speed rail project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 173, Sec. 3.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Applications for Grants [99660. - 99669.]

99660.

(a) The commission shall adopt guidelines, as necessary, to require that grants for transit projects be expended for projects which are essential to the implementation of safe and reliable transit services. The guidelines shall include criteria for the awarding of grants for new or rehabilitated rail construction for passenger rail projects, specifying a maximum cost per mile for service for various regions of the state.

(b) The purpose of this section is to facilitate
 implementation of improved cost-effective transit service to the maximum number of Californians and to prevent the funds provided for by this part from being spent on needlessly costly features.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99661.

The department, the Department of Parks and Recreation, or a local agency responsible for a project which is eligible for a grant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) may apply to the commission for a grant for that project. Each application shall identify the specific section of Chapter 3 which authorizes the grant applied for. If a project is proposed to be funded by grants authorized by more than one section, the application shall identify each of the applicable sections and shall specify the amount applied for under each of those
 sections.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99662.

Two or more applicant agencies may join in applying for a grant for a project in which each of the agencies will participate.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99663.

(a) In accordance with regulations and guidelines of the commission, each application shall be accompanied by a plan describing how the grant funds will be used, what other capital funds are available for the project, and how those funds will be used. The plan shall include a plan for operating any new service, including a financial plan for operation.

(b) The plan shall also identify the sources of the remainder of the funds required for construction and operation of
 any new service.

(c) The application shall demonstrate that a reasonable share of the cost of any new or rehabilitated passenger rail service, as determined by the commission, will be covered by farebox revenue.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99664.

(a) The commission, with the assistance of the department, shall commence its review of an application for a grant within 30 days of receipt of the application.
